Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.140

Guardian may be appointed.

A local board may appoint a guardian whenever and wherever the claim of a participant or his or her beneficiary would, in the opinion of the local board, be best served by the appointment. The local board shall have full power to make and direct the payments under this chapter to any person entitled to the payments without the necessity of any guardianship or administration proceedings, when in its judgment, it shall determine it to be for the best interests of the beneficiary.

[ 1999 c 148 s 12; 1989 c 91 s 14; 1945 c 261 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-28. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 2; RRS s 9578-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.